Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1448 N 1
SFX 1448 0 omycotic .

SFX 1449 N 1
SFX 1449 0 omyxidian .

SFX 1450 N 1
SFX 1450 0 on .

SFX 1451 N 1
SFX 1451 0 ona .

SFX 1452 N 1
SFX 1452 0 onasal .

SFX 1453 N 1
SFX 1453 0 oned .

SFX 1454 N 1
SFX 1454 0 ong .

SFX 1455 N 1
SFX 1455 0 oni .

SFX 1456 N 1
SFX 1456 0 onic .

SFX 1457 N 1
SFX 1457 0 oning .

SFX 1458 N 1
SFX 1458 0 onlike .

SFX 1459 N 1
SFX 1459 0 ons .

SFX 1460 N 1
SFX 1460 0 ony .

SFX 1461 N 1
SFX 1461 0 oo .

SFX 1462 N 1
SFX 1462 0 oon .

SFX 1463 N 1
SFX 1463 0 oons .

SFX 1464 N 1
SFX 1464 0 oos .

SFX 1465 N 1
SFX 1465 0 oot .

SFX 1466 N 1
SFX 1466 0 ooting .

SFX 1467 N 1
SFX 1467 0 oots .

SFX 1468 N 1
SFX 1468 0 opathy .

SFX 1469 N 1
SFX 1469 0 openia .

SFX 1470 N 1
SFX 1470 0 operative .

SFX 1471 N 1
SFX 1471 0 ophil .

SFX 1472 N 1
SFX 1472 0 ophile .

SFX 1473 N 1
SFX 1473 0 ophiles .

SFX 1474 N 1
SFX 1474 0 ophilia .

SFX 1475 N 1
SFX 1475 0 ophilias .

SFX 1476 N 1
SFX 1476 0 ophilic .

SFX 1477 N 1
SFX 1477 0 ophils .

SFX 1478 N 1
SFX 1478 0 ophore .

SFX 1479 N 1
SFX 1479 0 ophores .

SFX 1480 N 1
SFX 1480 0 oplasty .

SFX 1481 N 1
SFX 1481 0 opod .

SFX 1482 N 1
SFX 1482 0 opoid .

SFX 1483 N 1
SFX 1483 0 opsia .

SFX 1484 N 1
SFX 1484 0 optic .

SFX 1485 N 1
SFX 1485 0 optics .

SFX 1486 N 1
SFX 1486 0 oquinolones .

SFX 1487 N 1
SFX 1487 0 or .

SFX 1488 N 1
SFX 1488 0 ora .

SFX 1489 N 1
SFX 1489 0 ore .

SFX 1490 N 1
SFX 1490 0 ores .

SFX 1491 N 1
SFX 1491 0 oric .

SFX 1492 N 1
SFX 1492 0 oridectomy .

SFX 1493 N 1
SFX 1493 0 oros .

SFX 1494 N 1
SFX 1494 0 ors .

SFX 1495 N 1
SFX 1495 0 os .

SFX 1496 N 1
SFX 1496 0 oš .

SFX 1497 N 1
SFX 1497 0 osaur .

SFX 1498 N 1
SFX 1498 0 oscopies .

SFX 1499 N 1
SFX 1499 0 oscopy .

SFX 1500 N 1
SFX 1500 0 ose .

SFX 1501 N 1
SFX 1501 0 oses .

SFX 1502 N 1
SFX 1502 0 osin .

SFX 1503 N 1
SFX 1503 0 osis .

SFX 1504 N 1
SFX 1504 0 ostea .

SFX 1505 N 1
SFX 1505 0 osteum .

SFX 1506 N 1
SFX 1506 0 ot .

SFX 1507 N 1
SFX 1507 0 otherapy .

SFX 1508 N 1
SFX 1508 0 our .

SFX 1509 N 1
SFX 1509 0 ouracil .

SFX 1510 N 1
SFX 1510 0 ouracils .

SFX 1511 N 1
SFX 1511 0 oured .

SFX 1512 N 1
SFX 1512 0 ours .

SFX 1513 N 1
SFX 1513 0 ous .

SFX 1514 N 1
SFX 1514 0 ously .

SFX 1515 N 1
SFX 1515 0 ousness .

SFX 1516 N 1
SFX 1516 0 ousnesses .

SFX 1517 N 1
SFX 1517 0 ov .

SFX 1518 N 1
SFX 1518 0 ovina .

SFX 1519 N 1
SFX 1519 0 ovirus .

SFX 1520 N 1
SFX 1520 0 oviruses .

SFX 1521 N 1
SFX 1521 0 ovsk .

SFX 1522 N 1
SFX 1522 0 ovskii .

SFX 1523 N 1
SFX 1523 0 oze .

SFX 1524 N 1
SFX 1524 0 ozed .

SFX 1525 N 1
SFX 1525 0 ozes .

SFX 1526 N 1
SFX 1526 0 ozing .

SFX 1527 N 1
SFX 1527 0 ozoan .

SFX 1528 N 1
SFX 1528 0 pa .

SFX 1529 N 1
SFX 1529 0 page .

SFX 1530 N 1
SFX 1530 0 pai .

SFX 1531 N 1
SFX 1531 0 panshui .

SFX 1532 N 1
SFX 1532 0 para .

SFX 1533 N 1
SFX 1533 0 paradigm .

SFX 1534 N 1
SFX 1534 0 parous .

SFX 1535 N 1
SFX 1535 0 part .

SFX 1536 N 1
SFX 1536 0 particle .

SFX 1537 N 1
SFX 1537 0 particles .

SFX 1538 N 1
SFX 1538 0 partite .

SFX 1539 N 1
SFX 1539 0 pateticism .

SFX 1540 N 1
SFX 1540 0 pathic .

SFX 1541 N 1
SFX 1541 0 pathies .

SFX 1542 N 1
SFX 1542 0 pathologies .

SFX 1543 N 1
SFX 1543 0 pathology .

SFX 1544 N 1
SFX 1544 0 pathy .

SFX 1545 N 1
SFX 1545 0 patus .

SFX 1546 N 1
SFX 1546 0 patuses .

SFX 1547 N 1
SFX 1547 0 ped .

SFX 1548 N 1
SFX 1548 0 pedia .

SFX 1549 N 1
SFX 1549 0 penicillin .

SFX 1550 N 1
SFX 1550 0 pernong .

SFX 1551 N 1
SFX 1551 0 pernongs .

SFX 1552 N 1
SFX 1552 0 peteia .

SFX 1553 N 1
SFX 1553 0 petia .

SFX 1554 N 1
SFX 1554 0 pety .

SFX 1555 N 1
SFX 1555 0 phobia .

SFX 1556 N 1
SFX 1556 0 photon .

SFX 1557 N 1
SFX 1557 0 phrabang .

SFX 1558 N 1
SFX 1558 0 phrine .

SFX 1559 N 1
SFX 1559 0 phthalein .

SFX 1560 N 1
SFX 1560 0 phthalmos .

SFX 1561 N 1
SFX 1561 0 ping .

SFX 1562 N 1
SFX 1562 0 pipe .

SFX 1563 N 1
SFX 1563 0 pipes .

SFX 1564 N 1
SFX 1564 0 planetary .

SFX 1565 N 1
SFX 1565 0 plasmic .

SFX 1566 N 1
SFX 1566 0 plast .

SFX 1567 N 1
SFX 1567 0 plasts .

SFX 1568 N 1
SFX 1568 0 platform .

SFX 1569 N 1
SFX 1569 0 platinum .

SFX 1570 N 1
SFX 1570 0 player .

SFX 1571 N 1
SFX 1571 0 polar .

SFX 1572 N 1
SFX 1572 0 pole .

SFX 1573 N 1
SFX 1573 0 pore .

SFX 1574 N 1
SFX 1574 0 potent .

SFX 1575 N 1
SFX 1575 0 ppointedly .

SFX 1576 N 1
SFX 1576 0 priable .

SFX 1577 N 1
SFX 1577 0 priative .

SFX 1578 N 1
SFX 1578 0 propanolamine .

SFX 1579 N 1
SFX 1579 0 protein .

SFX 1580 N 1
SFX 1580 0 pteral .

SFX 1581 N 1
SFX 1581 0 pulation .

SFX 1582 N 1
SFX 1582 0 pur .

SFX 1583 N 1
SFX 1583 0 qabad .

SFX 1584 N 1
SFX 1584 0 qarfik .

SFX 1585 N 1
SFX 1585 0 qiu .

SFX 1586 N 1
SFX 1586 0 que .

SFX 1587 N 1
SFX 1587 0 quine .

SFX 1588 N 1
SFX 1588 0 quinone .

SFX 1589 N 1
SFX 1589 0 quinones .

SFX 1590 N 1
SFX 1590 0 r .

SFX 1591 N 1
SFX 1591 0 ra .

SFX 1592 N 1
SFX 1592 0 rages .

SFX 1593 N 1
SFX 1593 0 ram .

SFX 1594 N 1
SFX 1594 0 ramabad .

SFX 1595 N 1
SFX 1595 0 rampur .

SFX 1596 N 1
SFX 1596 0 ramshahr .

SFX 1597 N 1
SFX 1597 0 ran .

SFX 1598 N 1
SFX 1598 0 ranga .

SFX 1599 N 1
SFX 1599 0 rania .

SFX 1600 N 1
SFX 1600 0 ranias .

SFX 1601 N 1
SFX 1601 0 rases .

SFX 1602 N 1
SFX 1602 0 rasis .

SFX 1603 N 1
SFX 1603 0 rastic .

SFX 1604 N 1
SFX 1604 0 rch .

SFX 1605 N 1
SFX 1605 0 rchid .

SFX 1606 N 1
SFX 1606 0 rd .

SFX 1607 N 1
SFX 1607 0 rdfish .

SFX 1608 N 1
SFX 1608 0 rdial .

SFX 1609 N 1
SFX 1609 0 rdness .

SFX 1610 N 1
SFX 1610 0 rds .

SFX 1611 N 1
SFX 1611 0 re .

SFX 1612 N 1
SFX 1612 0 réab .

SFX 1613 N 1
SFX 1613 0 red .

SFX 1614 N 1
SFX 1614 0 ree .

SFX 1615 N 1
SFX 1615 0 rees .

SFX 1616 N 1
SFX 1616 0 refoil .

SFX 1617 N 1
SFX 1617 0 register .

SFX 1618 N 1
SFX 1618 0 renas .

SFX 1619 N 1
SFX 1619 0 renia .

SFX 1620 N 1
SFX 1620 0 reses .

SFX 1621 N 1
SFX 1621 0 resis .

SFX 1622 N 1
SFX 1622 0 respiratory .

SFX 1623 N 1
SFX 1623 0 rgetic .

SFX 1624 N 1
SFX 1624 0 rgetics .

SFX 1625 N 1
SFX 1625 0 rgist .

SFX 1626 N 1
SFX 1626 0 rgistically .

SFX 1627 N 1
SFX 1627 0 rgists .

SFX 1628 N 1
SFX 1628 0 rhinal .

SFX 1629 N 1
SFX 1629 0 rhosen .

SFX 1630 N 1
SFX 1630 0 ri .

SFX 1631 N 1
SFX 1631 0 ria .

SFX 1632 N 1
SFX 1632 0 riae .

SFX 1633 N 1
SFX 1633 0 rial .

SFX 1634 N 1
SFX 1634 0 riases .

SFX 1635 N 1
SFX 1635 0 riasis .

SFX 1636 N 1
SFX 1636 0 ried .

SFX 1637 N 1
SFX 1637 0 ries .

SFX 1638 N 1
SFX 1638 0 rii .

SFX 1639 N 1
SFX 1639 0 riid .

SFX 1640 N 1
SFX 1640 0 ring .

SFX 1641 N 1
SFX 1641 0 rional .

SFX 1642 N 1
SFX 1642 0 rism .

SFX 1643 N 1
SFX 1643 0 risms .

SFX 1644 N 1
SFX 1644 0 rist .

SFX 1645 N 1
SFX 1645 0 ristianly .

SFX 1646 N 1
SFX 1646 0 ristlike .

SFX 1647 N 1
SFX 1647 0 rium .

SFX 1648 N 1
SFX 1648 0 riums .

SFX 1649 N 1
SFX 1649 0 rlem .

SFX 1650 N 1
SFX 1650 0 rlemmermeer .

SFX 1651 N 1
SFX 1651 0 rm .

SFX 1652 N 1
SFX 1652 0 rmer .

SFX 1653 N 1
SFX 1653 0 rmers .

SFX 1654 N 1
SFX 1654 0 rnithology .

SFX 1655 N 1
SFX 1655 0 role .

SFX 1656 N 1
SFX 1656 0 ron .

SFX 1657 N 1
SFX 1657 0 rondi .

SFX 1658 N 1
SFX 1658 0 rondis .

SFX 1659 N 1
SFX 1659 0 rons .

SFX 1660 N 1
SFX 1660 0 root .

SFX 1661 N 1
SFX 1661 0 ropia .

SFX 1662 N 1
SFX 1662 0 ropic .

SFX 1663 N 1
SFX 1663 0 rpur .

SFX 1664 N 1
SFX 1664 0 rrate .

SFX 1665 N 1
SFX 1665 0 rrine .

SFX 1666 N 1
SFX 1666 0 rrines .

SFX 1667 N 1
SFX 1667 0 rs .

SFX 1668 N 1
SFX 1668 0 rsable .

SFX 1669 N 1
SFX 1669 0 rser .

SFX 1670 N 1
SFX 1670 0 rship .

SFX 1671 N 1
SFX 1671 0 rships .

SFX 1672 N 1
SFX 1672 0 rtages .

SFX 1673 N 1
SFX 1673 0 rticulate .

SFX 1674 N 1
SFX 1674 0 rticulated .

SFX 1675 N 1
SFX 1675 0 rticulates .

SFX 1676 N 1
SFX 1676 0 rticulating .

SFX 1677 N 1
SFX 1677 0 rtine .

SFX 1678 N 1
SFX 1678 0 rundi .

SFX 1679 N 1
SFX 1679 0 rundis .

SFX 1680 N 1
SFX 1680 0 rworthy .

SFX 1681 N 1
SFX 1681 0 ry .

SFX 1682 N 1
SFX 1682 0 s .

SFX 1683 N 1
SFX 1683 0 sa .

SFX 1684 N 1
SFX 1684 0 sail .

SFX 1685 N 1
SFX 1685 0 sails .

SFX 1686 N 1
SFX 1686 0 sation .
