Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
acidophil/557,646,819,1513,1682,1941
acrocarp/1513
acrogen/819,1513,1682
adduct/565,882,905,907,950,1487,1494,1682
affranchise/510,1682
Alam/1495
allegorise/1590
alphabetise/510,1590
aminophylline/1682
ampulla/557,1590,1681
analyse/510,1590,1667,1682
angiocarp/819,1513
antisyphilitic/1682
armilla/1681
arteriola/1590
artiodactyl/1513,1682
ascocarp/1513,1682
astrocyte/1682
atomise/1590,1667
auricula/1611,1682,1794,1796
authorise/510,1590,1682
autochthon/82,819,848,1513,1999
automat/1,917,1458,1682
backslap/1547,1561,1682
bandmate/1682
Banja/1597
benzyl/819,1549,1682
bezzant/1682
Bida/1590
bootie/1682
bowdlerise/510,1590,1682
brachiopod/1513,1682
branchiopod/115,1513,1682
burgrave/1682
calced/1460
capitula/1590,1681
catena/1637,1681,1794,1796,1816,1838
chaetognath/115,1513,1682
chalcocite/1682
chiromance/1590,1667
clit/819,826,1491,1492,1682,1810,1811,1812,1815
colly/882,1647,1648,1978
colonise/510,1590,1667
concha/1682
contrabass/646,1462,1463
cooccur/565,1640,1682
copyedit/565,882,1487,1494,1682
corymb/1500,1682
crucifer/1513,1682
cryptogam/819,1513,1682
cytoarchitectonic/1682
deblur/1613,1640
dialyze/510,1590,1667,1682
dichromat/819,924,1483
digitise/510,1590
dolour/1513,1682
doorstopper/1682
economise/510,1590,1667,1682
emmet/1661,1662,1682
enwrap/1547,1561,1682
eosin/1469,1471,1472,1473,1474,1475,1476,1477,1682
eponym/819,1514,1682,1999
equalise/510,1590,1667
erythroblast/1503,1682
escalade/1590,1682
eschatologist/1682
exode/1651,1682
Fedor/1517
fertilise/510,1590,1667
fosse/1682
frap/1547,1561,1682
Gazi/1582
gourmandize/510,1590,1682
gromwell/1682
Gros/1683
gynandromorph/819,1513,1682
Haa/1530,1590,1649,1650
hemic/1599,1600,2003,2004
Herceg/1518
horologe/1590,1667
horseweed/1682
huit/1611
humani/1686,1696,1698,1704,1727
hydatid/1503
ichor/1513,1682
Jabal/1582
jagua/1657,1658,1678,1679
jellaba/1682
jument/1513
Kage/1591
Karp/1496
Khai/1663
knap/1547,1561,1682,1972,1973
Kommune/1584
Kuna/1590
Lanka/1597
lede/1629
Libertad/1487
lithic/1682
Liu/1531,2001,2028
liza/1607
Louang/1557
macula/1590,1682,1794,1796,1816,1838,1839,1841
malaprop/1495,1682
malodor/1515,1516,1682
malodour/1513,1682
mammilla/557,1631
Marad/806,1451
Matam/1493
mentorship/1682
merl/557,646,870,897,1450,1682
milia/1631
milo/1606,1610,1682
misbelieve/510,1590,1667,1682
misdemean/565,882,1508,1512,1682
moderato/1670,1671
monochromat/924,1487
monopolise/510,1590
nativist/819,1682
nigga/1609
ochre/1513,1682
onomastic/1450,1459,1682
organise/510,1590,1667,1682
ortholog/1513,1682
overachievement/1682
overcrop/1547,1561,1682
overtop/1547,1561,1682
panoptic/82,1450
parallelopiped/1450,1682
parget/882,888,1681,1682,1796,1838
Passo/1611
pelecypod/1513,1682
Petropavl/1521
phytochemist/1681
pigboat/1682
plasticise/1590
pleurocarp/1513
poikilotherm/1513
polydactyl/1513,1999
premaxilla/1681
prosimian/1682
publicise/510,1590,1682
Punta/1618
radiochemist/1637,1681
resh/646,1465,1466,1467,1506
resorcinol/1559,1682
retroversion/1682
rigour/1515,1682
Sadi/1583
sarcoid/1501,1503
Sark/1522
scammony/1660
scup/1550,1551,1682
searobin/1682
Shaki/1591
shmo/1500,1523,1524,1525,1526
shrinkwrap/1547,1561,1682
Shub/1591
Siem/1612
skeletonize/510,1590,1682
sonorant/1682
sprit/1682,1684,1685
stabilise/510,1590,1667,1682
stent/882,1487,1494,1682
stertor/1514,1682
stoner/1465
subsidise/510,1590
subvalue/1682
syllogize/510,1590,1682
sympathise/510,1590,1667
symposia/1604,1754
syncarp/1513
synthesise/510,1590,1667,1682
syph/1450,1453,1457,1459,1682
systematise/510,1590
tautog/1593,1682
temporise/1590
tetramer/819,1513
theologize/1590,1667
theorise/510,1590,1682
thoroughwort/1682
thyrotoxic/1501,1503
thysanopter/1450
Toom/1611
tope/510,1590,1667,1682
totalise/1590,1667
totalize/1590,1667
tranquillise/1590
Tsing/1455
tweeze/510,1590,1667,1682
Tyl/1487
umbellifer/1513,1682
unai/1613,1680
unarm/565,882,1511,1682
unclip/1547,1561,1682
unicolor/1513
urtication/1682
variola/1590,1682,1839
vitalise/510,1590,1682
vive/1665,1666
vomer/1452
whap/1547,1561,1682
womanise/1590,1667
zidovudine/1682
zona/1681,1839
